Utah statutes.
40-10-7.   Financial interest in mining operation prohibited -- Penalty --
Enforcement -- Quorum for board hearings.
(1)  No employee of the division performing any function or duty under this
chapter shall have a direct or indirect financial interest in any underground
or surface coal mining operation.  Whoever knowingly violates the provisions
of this subsection shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more
than $2,500, or by imprisonment of not more than one year, or by both.  The
division shall adopt rules to establish methods by which the provisions of
this subsection will be monitored and enforced by the division, including
appropriate provisions for filing by these employees and the review of
statements and supplements to same concerning any financial interest which may
be affected by this section.
(2)  For the purpose of holding hearings under this chapter, a quorum of the
board shall consist of those members or member who has no conflict of interest
as set out in Public Law 95-87 and the rules and regulations adopted under it.
